Maryland, session 2025, SB0705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
(b) “Cloud computing” means a service that enables on–demand self–service
network access to a shared pool of configurable computer resources, including data storage,
analytics, commerce, streaming, e–mail, document sharing, and document editing.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Information Technology.
(D) (1) “OVERSIGHT OF IMPLEMENTATION” MEANS MANAGEMENT OF
THE PROCESS TO IMPLEMENT A NEW TECHNOLOGY, SYSTEM, OR PRODUCT INTO
PRACTICE AND USE BY A UNIT.
(2) “OVERSIGHT OF IMPLEMENTATION” INCLUDES:
(I) PLANNING AND PREPARATION TO IMPLEMENT THE
PRODUCT OR PRACTICE; AND
(II) ONGOING MONITORING AND SUPPORT OF THE
IMPLEMENTATION TEAM TO ENSURE SUCCESSFUL EXECUTION AND THAT THE
PROJECT GOALS ARE MET.
(3) “OVERSIGHT OF IMPLEMENTATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) RESPONSIBILITY FOR DAY–TO–DAY MANAGEMENT OF ANY
INDIVIDUAL PROJECTS OR PRODUCTS; OR
(II) RESPONSIBILITY FOR IMPLEMENTING INDIVIDUAL–LEVEL
PROCESS REQUIREMENTS FOR A PROJECT OR PRODUCT.
[(d)] (E) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Information Technology.
[(e)] (F) “Telecommunication” means the transmission of information, images,
pictures, voice, or data by radio, video, or other electronic or impulse means.
[(f)] (G) “Unit of State government” means an agency or unit of the Executive
Branch of State government.
3.5–307.
(a) (1) A unit of State government may not purchase, lease, CONTRACT FOR,
or rent AN information technology SERVICE OR PRODUCT unless consistent with the
master plan, as determined by the Secretary.
(2) A unit of State government other than a public institution of higher
education may not make expenditures for major information technology development
projects or cybersecurity projects except as provided in § 3.5–308 of this subtitle.
– 3 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (1) The Department [of General Services], in consultation with the
Department OF GENERAL SERVICES, shall [hire a consultant to] assess the procurement
process for information technology projects involving modernization and make
recommendations to increase the State’s ability to proceed with a modernization project in
a rapid and responsive manner.
3.5–308.
(a) This section does not apply to a public institution of higher education.
(b) Before submitting its information technology project requests, a unit of State
government shall submit information in support of the request required by the Secretary
for review and determination consistent with § 3.5–301(k) of this subtitle.
(c) In reviewing information technology project requests, the Secretary may
change a unit’s designation of a major information technology development project.
(d) The Secretary shall review and, with the advice of the Secretary of Budget and
Management, approve major information technology development projects and
specifications for consistency with all statewide plans, policies, and standards, including a
systems development life cycle plan.
(e) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Secretary shall be responsible for overseeing the implementation of major information
technology development projects, regardless of fund source.
(2) AS PART OF THE SECRETARY’S RESPONSIBILITIES UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ENSURE THAT NO FUNDING IS PROVIDED FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF A MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT UNLESS:
(I) THE SECRETARY DETERMINES THAT THE UNIT HAS THE
INTERNAL CAPACITY TO ADEQUATELY SUPPORT THE PROJECT, PROGRAM
MANAGEMENT, AND RESPONSIBILITY OVER PROGRAM ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING:
1. HUMAN CAPITAL;
2. SUBJECT MATTER EXPERTISE; AND
3. TECHNICAL INFRASTRUCTURE;
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS OF AWARDING A CONTRACT, THE
MANAGING UNIT SENDS TO THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS AND THE LEGISLATIVE
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
POLICY COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, NOTICE THAT:
1. IDENTIFIES THE PROJECT MANAGEMENT TEAM;
2. AFFIRMS THAT THE DEPARTMENT HAS REVIEWED
AND APPROVED THE CONTRACT; AND
3. IS SIGNED BY THE HEAD OF THE UNIT
ACKNOWLEDGING AND ACCEPTING THE ACCOUNTABILITY FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECT OR PRODUCT; AND
(III) WHILE A UNIT IS MANAGING AN ACTIVE PROJECT OR
PRODUCT, THE UNIT AGREES TO REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT EVERY 3 MONTHS
ON THE PROJECT STATUS IN A MANNER REQUESTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(f) (1) With the advice of the Secretary of Budget and Management,
expenditures for major information technology development projects shall be subject to the
approval of the Secretary who shall approve expenditures only when those projects are
consistent with statewide plans, policies, and standards.
(2) (I) The Secretary shall make a recommendation to the Secretary of
Budget and Management [that] TO WITHHOLD project funds, regardless of fund source,
[be withheld] if:
[(i)] 1. a unit of State government is not consistently reporting on
the status of a project or projects to the Department in the form and manner required by
the Department; or
[(ii)] 2. the Department determines that project implementation
issues exist, including project timeline delays, significant cost increases, vendor
nonperformance, decreased agency capacity, or other issues that indicate issues of concern
that could jeopardize successful implementation.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AND
EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SHALL WITHHOLD ANY UNEXPENDED
FUNDS APPROPRIATED IN A FISCAL YEAR FOR A MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT AT THE SECRETARY’S RECOMMENDATION ISSUED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT MAY
RELEASE FUNDS WITHHELD UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH AT THE DIRECTION OF THE
– 5 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECRETARY IF THE SECRETARY DETERMINES THAT THE ISSUE LEADING TO THE
INITIAL WITHHOLDING OF FUNDS HAS BEEN ADDRESSED.
(3) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER FUNDING IS WITHHELD IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT ON THE PURPOSE OF
THE WITHHOLDING:
(I) TO THE GOVERNOR; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, TO:
1. THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE;
2. THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT;
3. THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE;
4. THE HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT
OPERATIONS COMMITTEE; AND
5. THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON CYBERSECURITY,
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, AND BIOTECHNOLOGY.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. THE SECRETARY MAY RECOMMEND TO THE
SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT THAT FUNDING WITHHELD UNDER THIS
SECTION BE REALLOCATED TO OTHER EXPENSES OF THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT FUND UNDER § 3.5–309 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT
MAY, AT THEIR DISCRETION, FOLLOW THE SECRETARY’S RECOMMENDATION TO
REALLOCATE FUNDS.
(II) IF THE REALLOCATED FUNDS EXCEED $500,000, THE
SECRETARY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND
MANAGEMENT, SHALL SUBMIT A PROPOSAL TO THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY
COMMITTEE FOR A 60–DAY REVIEW AND COMMENT PERIOD.
(g) (1) The Secretary shall approve funding for major information technology
development projects, expedited projects, and other expenditures from the Fund only when:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
(i) the major information technology development projects or the
expedited projects are in compliance with statewide plans, policies, and standards, as
determined by the Secretary; and
(ii) the major information technology development projects are
supported by an approved systems development life cycle plan.
(2) An approved systems development life cycle plan shall include
submission of:
(i) a project planning request that details initial planning for the
project, including:
1. the project title, appropriation code, and summary;
2. a description of:
A. the business and technology outcomes to be achieved by
the project;
B. the features available to the end user on completion,
including user acceptance testing and accessibility plans;
C. the potential risks associated with the project;
D. possible alternatives; and
E. the scope and complexity of the project; and
3. an estimate of:
A. the total costs required to complete through planning; and
B. the fund sources available to support planning costs; and
(ii) a project implementation request to begin full design,
development, and implementation of the project after the completion of planning, including:
1. the project title, appropriation code, and summary;
2. a description of:
A. the business and technology outcomes to be achieved by
the project and the metrics by which the success of those outcomes will be measured;
– 7 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. the features available to the end user on completion,
including user acceptance testing and accessibility plans;
C. the potential risks associated with the project;
D. possible alternatives;
E. the scope and complexity of the project; and
F. how the project meets the goals of the statewide master
plan; and
3. an estimate of:
A. the total project cost, by phase; and
B. the fund sources to be utilized.
(3) The Secretary may approve funding incrementally, consistent with the
systems development life cycle plan.
(h) [The Department, in consultation with the Modernize Maryland Commission
established under § 3.5–316 of this subtitle,] ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE
DEPARTMENT shall:
(1) develop standards for units of State government to assist in identifying
legacy systems that require modernization projects appropriate to be financed as an
expedited project through the Fund;
(2) adopt an Information Technology Investment Maturity Model that
includes:
(i) criteria to inform and prioritize investment decisions;
(ii) processes to develop the information required to evaluate
investment proposals against the criteria under item (i) of this item; and
(iii) management processes to monitor the implementation of
approved modernization projects; and
(3) develop a State Modernization Plan.
3.5–309.
(a) There is an Information Technology Investment Fund.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
[(n) (1) On or before November 1 of each year, the Secretary shall report to the
Governor and the Secretary of Budget and Management and, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate
Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment, the House Appropriations
Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and the Joint
Committee on Cybersecurity, Information Technology, and Biotechnology.
(2) The report shall include:
(i) the financial status of the Fund and a summary of its operations
for the preceding fiscal year;
(ii) an accounting for the preceding fiscal year of all money from each
of the revenue sources specified in subsection (e) of this section, including any expenditures
made from the Fund; and
(iii) for each project receiving money from the Fund in the preceding
fiscal year and for each major information technology development project or expedited
project receiving funding from any source other than the Fund in the preceding fiscal year:
1. the status of the project and project funding decisions;
2. a comparison of estimated and actual costs of the project;
3. any known or anticipated changes in scope or costs of the
project;
4. an evaluation of whether the project is using best
practices; and
5. a summary of any monitoring and oversight of the project
from outside the agency in which the project is being developed, including a description of
any problems identified by any external review and any corrective actions taken.]
[(o)] (N) (1) On or before January 15 of each year, for each major information
technology development project or expedited project currently in development or for which
operations and maintenance funding is being provided in accordance with subsection (i)(3)
of this section, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Secretary shall
provide a summary report to the Department of Legislative Services with the most
up–to–date project information including:
[(1)] (I) project funding decisions and project status, INCLUDING:
1. ESTIMATED PROJECT OR PRODUCT COSTS;
2. FUNDING SOURCES; AND
– 9 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. ONGOING OPERATING COSTS AFTER THE PROJECT IS
NO LONGER A MAJOR DEVELOPMENT PROJECT OR EXPEDITED PROJECT,
INCLUDING:
A. COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH PROCURING AND
MAINTAINING LICENSES; AND
B. SUPPORT TO CONTINUOUSLY MAINTAIN AND
IMPROVE THE PROJECT OR PRODUCT;
[(2)] (II) any schedule, cost, and scope changes since the last annual
report;
[(3)] (III) a risk assessment [including any problems identified by any
internal or external review and any corrective actions taken; and] PROVIDED BY EITHER
THE DEPARTMENT OR THE DESIGNATED UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT THAT
DETAILS THE IDENTIFIED PROJECT OR PRODUCT RISK, INCLUDING:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF THE TYPE OF RISK, INCLUDING:
A. GOVERNANCE;
B. RESOURCE AVAILABILITY OR CAPABILITY;
C. FUNDING;
D. INTERDEPENDENCIES WITH OTHER SYSTEMS;
E. TECHNICAL ISSUES;
F. ORGANIZATIONAL CULTURE; OR
G. ABILITY TO SUPPORT IN THE LONG TERM;
2. THE RISK LIKELIHOOD;
3. THE RISK PRIORITY;
4. THE RISK OWNER;
5. PLANNED RISK MITIGATION STRATEGY; AND
6. THE RISK STATUS AS OF THE REPORT DATE;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
(IV) PROJECT TRACKING METRICS, INCLUDING:
1. DESCRIBING THE FUNCTIONALITY AND FEATURES
THAT HAVE BEEN DELIVERED AS OF THE REPORT DATE; AND
2. QUALITATIVE AND QUANTITATIVE DATA SHOWING
PROGRESS TOWARDS PROJECT GOALS; AND
[(4)] (V) any change in the monitoring or oversight status.
(2) THE REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) IS CONFIDENTIAL AND NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE
UNDER TITLE 4 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE;
(II) SHALL COMMUNICATE THE REQUISITE INFORMATION IN A
CLEAR AND CONCISE MANNER THAT, TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE, AVOIDS
THE USE OF TECHNICAL LANGUAGE OR RELIANCE ON EXISTING INDUSTRY
KNOWLEDGE; AND
(III) SHALL INCLUDE AN EXECUTIVE SUMMARY OF KEY
INFORMATION, INCLUDING:
1. THE TOTAL VALUE OF THE PORTFOLIO, INCLUDING:
A. ANNUAL DEVELOPMENT COSTS;
B. FUNDING SOURCES; AND
C. PROJECTED ONGOING OPERATING COSTS OVER THE
NEXT 5 YEARS; AND
2. A SUMMARY OF NEW PROJECTS INCLUDING:
A. THE ADVANTAGES OF THE NEW PROJECTS; AND
B. ANY NEW OR INNOVATIVE ASPECTS OF DEVELOPMENT
PROCESSES.
(O) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH AND MAINTAIN A PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE PROJECT AND PORTFOLIO DASHBOARD ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE.
– 11 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE DASHBOARD SHALL INCLUDE ALL MAJOR INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS AND EXPEDITED PROJECTS, ORGANIZED
BY THE ACCOUNTABLE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
(3) FOR EACH PROJECT, THE DASHBOARD SHALL:
(I) SPECIFY THE SCHEDULE MANAGEMENT FOR THE PROJECT,
INCLUDING:
1. THE PROJECT START DATE;
2. ESTIMATED LENGTH OF THE PROJECT, BY PHASE;
3. PLANNED MILESTONES WITH ESTIMATED
COMPLETION DATES; AND
4. COMPLETED MILESTONES WITH COMPLETION DATES;
(II) LIST THE ESTIMATED PROJECT COST;
(III) LIST THE TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED FOR THE
CURRENT FISCAL YEAR;
(IV) LIST THE TOTAL AMOUNT SPENT DURING THE PRIOR FISCAL
YEAR, CATEGORIZED BY:
1. VENDOR COSTS;
2. AGENCY LABOR;
3. SOFTWARE LICENSES, SUBSCRIPTIONS, AND OTHER
COSTS;
4. OTHER EXPENSES; AND
5. TOTAL EXPENDITURES;
(V) FOR PROJECTS IN DEVELOPMENT:
1. THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR FORECAST ACCOMPANIED
BY ACTUAL DATA AND THE RESULTING VARIANCE; AND
2. THE CURRENT YEAR FORECAST; AND
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
(VI) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (P) OF THIS SECTION, IDENTIFY
MAJOR PROJECT OR PRODUCT RISKS, INCLUDING:
1. RISK DESCRIPTION;
2. RISK IMPACT;
3. RISK LIKELIHOOD;
4. MITIGATION STRATEGY; AND
5. RISK STATUS.
(P) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REDACT SPECIFIC RISKS IDENTIFIED
UNDER SUBSECTION (O)(3)(VI) OF THIS SECTION FROM THE PUBLIC DASHBOARD IF
THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT PUBLIC SHARING OF THE INFORMATION
COULD POSE A RISK TO THE PROJECT.
(2) IF A RISK IS REDACTED FROM THE DASHBOARD, THE
INFORMATION SHALL BE SHARED WITH THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE.
(3) A RISK REDACTED FROM THE DASHBOARD IS CONFIDENTIAL AND
NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER TITLE 4 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE.
[(p)] (Q) (1) The Secretary may adopt regulations necessary to carry out this
section.
(2) The Secretary shall adopt regulations necessary to establish a process
for units of State government to request and receive funding for an expedited project
aligned with the State Modernization Plan that shall:
(i) allow units of State government to apply for project funding
biannually;
(ii) be consistent with the goals and preferences established under
Title 14 of this article and encourage small and minority business enterprise vendors; and
(iii) provide measures that ensure compliance with this subtitle and
the Department’s regulations by both vendors and units of State government.
(R) THE CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER FOR A UNIT OF STATE
GOVERNMENT WITH A PLANNED OR ONGOING MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT SHALL MEET WITH THE SECRETARY ON A QUARTERLY
– 13 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
BASIS TO REPORT ON AND DISCUSS THE ONGOING INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS, INCLUDING:
(1) PROJECT BUDGET;
(2) PROJECT VENDOR PERFORMANCE OR NONPERFORMANCE;
(3) PROJECT SCOPE;
(4) PROJECT SCHEDULE;
(5) THE CAPACITY OF THE UNIT TO IMPLEMENT THE PROJECT; AND
(6) ANY OTHER ITEMS THE SECRETARY DEEMS RELEVANT TO THE
SUCCESSFUL IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROJECT.
SUBTITLE 9. MARYLAND OFFICE OF DIGITAL EXPERIENCE.
3.5–901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “DIVISION” MEANS THE MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT OVERSIGHT DIVISION.
(C) “OFFICE” MEANS THE MARYLAND OFFICE OF DIGITAL EXPERIENCE.
(D) “SERVICE” MEANS THE MARYLAND DIGITAL SERVICE UNIT.
3.5–902.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND OFFICE OF DIGITAL EXPERIENCE.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE OFFICE IS TO:
(1) PROVIDE OVERSIGHT, LEADERSHIP, INTERVENTION, AND
STRATEGIC MODERNIZATION FOR MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS, INCLUDING LARGE–SCALE, HIGH IMPACT,
MULTI–AGENCY PROJECTS, IN A TRANSPARENT MANNER THAT ENSURES A POSITIVE
RETURN ON INVESTMENT; AND
(2) DIRECT THE DEVELOPMENT OF MODERNIZED SYSTEMS IN A
MANNER THAT:
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
(I) WHEN APPROPRIATE, PRIORITIZES A PRODUCT–BASED
APPROACH TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF MODERNIZED SYSTEMS OVER A
PROJECT–BASED APPROACH;
(II) IS COST–EFFECTIVE;
(III) LOWERS RISKS;
(IV) DELIVERS VALUE FASTER; AND
(V) OTHERWISE IMPROVES THE DELIVERY OF SERVICES FOR
RESIDENTS OF THE STATE.
3.5–903.
THE SECRETARY SHALL APPOINT A CHIEF DIGITAL EXPERIENCE OFFICER TO
SERVE AS THE HEAD OF THE OFFICE.
3.5–904.
(A) (1) THE OFFICE MAY EMPLOY OR RETAIN REGULAR OR
CONTRACTUAL EMPLOYEES AT THE DISCRETION OF THE CHIEF DIGITAL SERVICES
OFFICER AND CHIEF OF THE DIVISION AS NECESSARY TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THE OFFICE.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
CHIEF DIGITAL SERVICES OFFICER AND CHIEF OF THE DIVISION MAY SET THE
COMPENSATION FOR OFFICE EMPLOYEES.
(II) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SHALL
APPROVE ANY COMPENSATION PROPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) THE OFFICE MAY USE A SHORT–TERM CONTRACT OR CONTRACTUAL
HIRING TO SUPPORT HUMAN RESOURCE NEEDS TO SUPPORT THE RAPID HIRING OF
OFFICE EMPLOYEES AND CONTRACTORS.
(C) TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE OFFICE MAY
REQUIRE A UNIT TO PROVIDE REIMBURSEMENT FOR SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE
OFFICE FROM FUNDS PROVIDED TO THE UNIT FROM THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT FUND OR OTHER FUNDS ALLOCATED TO THE UNIT FOR
AN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECT OR PRODUCT.
3.5–905.
– 15 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND DIGITAL SERVICE UNIT IN THE OFFICE.
(B) THE SERVICE SHALL COLLABORATE WITH UNITS OF STATE
GOVERNMENT TO SUPPORT IMPROVED SERVICE DELIVERY TO STATE RESIDENTS
AND AGENCY STAFF TO IMPLEMENT:
(1) USER–CENTERED DESIGN;
(2) SOFTWARE DEVELOPMENT; AND
(3) PROJECT MANAGEMENT BEST PRACTICES.
(C) THE SERVICE IS RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(1) ASSISTING UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT TO PRIORITIZE THE
DEVELOPMENT AND PROCUREMENT OF USER–FRIENDLY, ACCESSIBLE, AND
MULTILINGUAL DIGITAL PLATFORMS TO ENSURE THAT ALL STATE RESIDENTS,
INCLUDING THOSE WITH DISABILITIES, CAN EASILY ACCESS AND USE GOVERNMENT
SERVICES AND INFORMATION;
(2) WORKING COLLABORATIVELY WITH UNITS OF STATE
GOVERNMENT TO:
(I) CONSOLIDATE AND STREAMLINE STATE WEBSITES AND
DIGITAL APPLICATIONS TO REDUCE REDUNDANCY, COMPLEXITY, AND
MAINTENANCE COSTS; AND
(II) PRIORITIZE PROJECTS THAT ARE FINANCIALLY EFFICIENT
AND DRIVE POSITIVE OUTCOMES FOR STATE RESIDENTS; AND
(3) OVERSEEING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF USER–CENTERED DESIGN
PRINCIPLES, ACCESSIBILITY STANDARDS, AND BEST PRACTICES ACROSS UNITS OF
STATE GOVERNMENT.
(D) UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL COLLABORATE WITH THE
SERVICE TO ENSURE THAT THE ALIGNMENT AND FUNDING OF A DIGITAL INITIATIVE
IS CONSISTENT WITH:
(1) THE OVERALL GOALS AND PRIORITIES OF THE STATE; AND
(2) THE STATEWIDE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MASTER PLAN.
3.5–906.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
(A) THERE IS A MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT OVERSIGHT DIVISION IN THE OFFICE.
(B) THE DIVISION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL:
(1) ADOPT NEW STANDARDS BY WHICH MAJOR INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS AND EXPEDITED PROJECTS ARE REQUIRED
TO COMPLY, IN ALIGNMENT WITH THE STATE SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT LIFE CYCLE;
(2) MONITOR THE PERFORMANCE OF PROJECT MANAGEMENT TEAMS
FOR MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS AND
EXPEDITED PROJECTS AND ENSURE THE TEAMS HAVE THE APPROPRIATE TALENT
AND EXPERTISE NECESSARY TO DELIVER THE INTENDED PROJECT VALUE; AND
(3) PROVIDE EXPERTISE, SUPPORT, AND INTERVENTION AS
NECESSARY FOR THE PROJECT MANAGEMENT TEAM TO SUCCESSFULLY IMPLEMENT
A PROJECT IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH STANDARDS ADOPTED UNDER ITEM (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) THE DIVISION SHALL ESTABLISH AND STAFF A DISCOVERY TEAM TO
DEPLOY TEAM MEMBERS TO HELP UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT ASSIST THE UNIT
IN IDENTIFYING:
(1) WHAT PROBLEM THE USE OF AN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
PROJECT OR PRODUCT IS SOLVING;
(2) WHO THE USERS OF THE PROJECT OR PRODUCT WILL BE;
(3) WHAT A SUCCESSFUL SOLUTION WOULD LOOK LIKE; AND
(4) OTHER ISSUES TO ENSURE SUCCESSFUL IMPLEMENTATION OF
THE PROJECT OR PRODUCT.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE SECRETARY
MAY DELEGATE ANY MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT
TO THE DIVISION THAT THE SECRETARY DETERMINES IS APPROPRIATE TO SERVE
AS A PILOT PROJECT FOR THE DIVISION TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES DESCRIBED IN
THIS SECTION.
3.5–907.
BEGINNING DECEMBER 31, 2025, AND EACH JULY 1 AND DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, IN CONSULTATION WITH
– 17 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL REPORT TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION
COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT OPERATIONS
COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON ANY PROJECTS OVER $1,000,000 UNDERTAKEN BY A UNIT OF STATE
GOVERNMENT UNDER A MASTER CONTRACT FOR STATEWIDE AGILE RESOURCES
AND TEAMS CONTRACT OR WORK ORDER APPROVED BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC
WORKS IN FISCAL YEAR 2025, INCLUDING:
(1) THE CONTRACT OR WORK ORDER AMOUNT AND TOTAL ESTIMATED
PROJECT COST;
(2) WHETHER THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES AND THE
SECRETARY HAVE DETERMINED THAT THE UNIT HAS THE INTERNAL CAPACITY TO
ADEQUATELY SUPPORT THE PROJECT AND PROGRAM MANAGEMENT
RESPONSIBILITIES, INCLUDING ADEQUATE:
(I) HUMAN CAPITAL;
(II) SUBJECT MATTER EXPERTISE; AND
(III) TECHNICAL INFRASTRUCTURE;
(3) WHETHER THE HEAD OF THE UNIT ACCEPTED ACCOUNTABILITY
FOR THE OVERSIGHT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROJECT;
(4) THE MEMBERS OF THE PROJECT MANAGEMENT TEAM; AND
(5) AFFIRMATIVE AGREEMENTS THAT, AS PART OF THE CONTRACT OR
WORK ORDER APPROVAL, THE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT SUBMITS A REPORT
REGARDING PROJECT STATUS TO THE DEPARTMENT EVERY 3 MONTHS.
Article – State Government
2–411.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “BOARD” MEANS THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
ADVISORY BOARD.
(B) THERE IS AN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ADVISORY BOARD TO
ADVISE THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE.
(C) (1) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF EIGHT MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC WITH
EXPERTISE IN:
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
(I) ENTERPRISE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGEMENT
EXPERIENCE; AND
(II) SPECIFIC TECHNOLOGY EXPERIENCE, INCLUDING
EXPERIENCE WITH ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AND CYBERSECURITY.
(2) (I) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE SHALL APPOINT FOUR OF
THE BOARD MEMBERS.
(II) THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE SHALL APPOINT FOUR OF
THE BOARD MEMBERS.
(3) THE PRESIDENT AND THE SPEAKER SHALL JOINTLY DESIGNATE
A MEMBER TO SERVE AS CHAIR OF THE BOARD.
(D) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:
(1) (I) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
BOARD; BUT
(II) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER
THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET;
(2) IS SUBJECT TO THE PUBLIC ETHICS LAW; AND
(3) SHALL DISCLOSE TO THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION IF THE
MEMBER:
(I) IS EMPLOYED BY AN ENTITY THAT CURRENTLY DOES
BUSINESS WITH THE STATE THAT IS RELATED TO THE MATTERS BEFORE THE
BOARD; OR
(II) HAS A FINANCIAL INTEREST IN AN ENTITY THAT CURRENTLY
DOES BUSINESS WITH THE STATE THAT IS RELATED TO THE MATTERS BEFORE THE
BOARD.
(E) THE BOARD SHALL BE STAFFED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE
SERVICES.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) SERVE AS AN EXPERT ADVISORY ENTITY TO THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY; AND
– 19 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) REVIEW ANY STATE REPORTS OR OTHER AVAILABLE
INFORMATION REGARDING EXISTING MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS, INCLUDING:
(I) PROJECT MANAGEMENT AND OVERSIGHT REPORTS
PROVIDED CONFIDENTIALLY TO THE DEPARTMENT OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICES;
(II) ANY CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION REGARDING PROJECT
RISKS SUBMITTED TO THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE;
(III) THE STATE MODERNIZATION PLAN;
(IV) LEGACY SYSTEM STANDARDS, INVENTORY, AND FUNDING
PROJECTIONS;
(V) STATE USE OF THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
INVESTMENT MATURITY MODEL;
(VI) THE STATE CENTRALIZATION STRATEGIES FOR:
1. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGEMENT; AND
2. CYBERSECURITY; AND
(VII) THE STATE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE ROADMAP
DEVELOPED BY THE GOVERNOR’S ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SUBCABINET.
(G) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 15 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT
TO THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE AND THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON
CYBERSECURITY, INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, AND BIOTECHNOLOGY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS TITLE, A REPORT THAT:
(1) INTERPRETS AND SUMMARIZES THE REPORTS AND OTHER
INFORMATION REVIEWED UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) PROVIDES ADVICE TO THE STATE BASED ON THE REPORTS AND
OTHER INFORMATION REVIEWED; AND
(3) COMMUNICATES THE REQUISITE INFORMATION IN A CLEAR AND
CONCISE MANNER THAT, TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE, AVOIDS THE USE OF
TECHNICAL LANGUAGE OR RELIANCE ON EXISTING INDUSTRY KNOWLEDGE.
Chapter 497 of the Acts of 2024
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
[SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2024, the Joint Audit and Evaluation Committee, in consultation with the Joint Committee
on Cybersecurity, Information Technology, and Biotechnology, shall study and make
recommendations for any statutory and operational changes necessary to address the
findings of the audit issued on April 2, 2024, by the Office of Legislative Audits in the
Department of Legislative Services and shall report on any recommendations for statutory
changes to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
the General Assembly, including the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate
Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment, the House Appropriations
Committee, and the House Health and Government Operations Committee.]
3.5–309.
(a) There is an Information Technology Investment Fund.
(n) (1) On or before [November] OCTOBER 1 of each year, the Secretary shall
report to the Governor and the Secretary of Budget and Management and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment, the House
Appropriations Committee, the House Health and Government Operations Committee, and
the Joint Committee on Cybersecurity, Information Technology, and Biotechnology.
(2) The report shall include:
(i) the financial status of the Fund and a summary of its operations
for the preceding fiscal year;
(ii) an accounting for the preceding fiscal year of all money from each
of the revenue sources specified in subsection (e) of this section, including any expenditures
made from the Fund; and
(iii) for each project receiving money from the Fund in the preceding
fiscal year and for each major information technology development project or expedited
project receiving funding from any source other than the Fund in the preceding fiscal year:
1. A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE PROJECT, INCLUDING
MAJOR CUSTOMERS AND INTERDEPENDENCIES WITH OTHER SYSTEMS;
2. AN ANALYSIS OF HOW THE PROJECT GOALS PROVIDE
AN ADVANTAGE OVER CURRENT AGENCY OPERATIONS, INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION
OF KEY PROJECT GOALS, CRITICAL SUCCESS FACTORS, HOW THE PROJECT
SUPPORTS THE BUSINESS PROCESS, AND WHETHER THE SUCCESSFUL PROJECT
WILL PROVIDE A BASIS FOR A FUTURE PROJECT AT THE SAME OR ANY OTHER UNIT
OF STATE GOVERNMENT;
– 21 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. A DESCRIPTION OF TECHNOLOGIES EMPLOYED IN
THE PROJECT;
4. AN ASSESSMENT OF THE VENDOR POOL OF LIKELY
BIDDERS OR OFFERORS;
5. A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROCESS USED TO DEVELOP
THE PROJECT;
6. AN OVERVIEW OF THE PROJECT SCHEDULE,
INCLUDING ANY INTERMEDIATE PROJECT DEADLINES;
[1.] 7. the status of the project and project funding
decisions;
[2.] 8. a comparison of estimated and actual costs of the
project;
[3.] 9. any known or anticipated changes in scope or costs
of the project;
10. A DESCRIPTION OF ANY ONGOING OPERATING
EXPENSES AS A RESULT OF THE PROJECT AND A TIMELINE OF WHEN THOSE COSTS
WILL BE INCURRED;
[4.] 11. an evaluation of whether the project is using best
practices; and
[5.] 12. a summary of any monitoring and oversight of the
project from outside the agency in which the project is being developed, including a
description of any problems identified by any external review and any corrective actions
taken.
(3) THE REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) WRITTEN, AS PRACTICABLE, IN A MANNER THAT IS CLEAR,
CONCISE, AND WELL–ORGANIZED AND AVOIDS TECHNICAL JARGON;
(II) STRUCTURED TO INCLUDE AN EXECUTIVE SUMMARY OF KEY
INFORMATION THAT HIGHLIGHTS ACTION ITEMS AND DECISION POINTS,
INCLUDING:
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
1. THE TOTAL VALUE OF THE PORTFOLIO, INCLUDING
ANNUAL DEVELOPMENT COSTS, FUNDING SOURCES, AND PREDICTED ONGOING
OPERATING COSTS OVER THE NEXT 5 YEARS;
2. A SUMMARY OF NEW PROJECTS, THE ADVANTAGES OF
THE PROJECTS, AND ANY NEW OR INNOVATIVE ASPECTS OF THE DEVELOPMENT
PROCESSES;
3. AN ASSESSMENT OF THE NEW TECHNOLOGIES AND
BEST PRACTICES EMPLOYED ACROSS THE PORTFOLIO, INCLUDING HOW THOSE
TECHNOLOGIES ALIGN TO THE STATE MASTER PLAN;
4. A DASHBOARD GRAPHIC TO DEPICT THE BASIC
STATUS OF ALL PROJECTS IN THE PORTFOLIO, INCLUDING THE STATUS AS IT
RELATES TO MILESTONES AND FINANCIAL INVESTMENT; AND
5. AN ASSESSMENT OF ANY RISKS IDENTIFIED, BY TYPE
AND AGENCY; AND
(III) MADE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE.
(o) (1) On or before January 15 of each year, for each major information
technology development project or expedited project currently in development or for which
operations and maintenance funding is being provided in accordance with subsection (i)(3)
of this section, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Secretary shall
provide a summary report to THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE
SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, THE
HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE HEALTH AND GOVERNMENT
OPERATIONS COMMITTEE, THE JOINT COMMITTEE ON CYBERSECURITY,
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, AND BIOTECHNOLOGY, AND the Department of
Legislative Services with the most up–to–date project information including:
[(1)] (I) project funding decisions and project status, INCLUDING:
1. ANNUAL DEVELOPMENT COSTS;
2. FUNDING SOURCES; AND
3. ONGOING OPERATING COSTS, INCLUDING LICENSES
AND SUPPORT TO MAINTAIN AND UPDATE THE SYSTEM;
[(2)] (II) any schedule, cost, and scope changes since the [last annual]
report REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (N) OF THIS SECTION WAS SUBMITTED;
– 23 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(3)] (III) a risk assessment THAT GIVES A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF
THE RISK IDENTIFIED, including:
1. TYPE OF RISK IDENTIFIED, INCLUDING AGENCY
GOVERNANCE, STAFF RESOURCE AVAILABILITY OR TRAINING, FUNDING,
INTERDEPENDENCIES WITH OTHER SYSTEMS, TECHNICAL ISSUES,
ORGANIZATIONAL CULTURE, OR LONG–TERM SUPPORTABILITY; AND
2. any problems identified by any internal or external review
and any corrective actions taken; [and]
(IV) PROJECT TRACKING METRICS, INCLUDING:
1. PROJECT DEADLINES AND ASSOCIATED
DELIVERABLES; AND
2. A DESCRIPTION OF ANY CHANGES IN SCOPE,
TIMELINE, AND COSTS; AND
[(4)] (V) any change in the monitoring or oversight status.
(2) THE REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) WRITTEN, AS PRACTICABLE, IN A MANNER THAT IS CLEAR,
CONCISE, AND WELL–ORGANIZED AND AVOIDS TECHNICAL JARGON;
(II) STRUCTURED TO INCLUDE AN EXECUTIVE SUMMARY OF KEY
INFORMATION THAT HIGHLIGHTS ACTION ITEMS AND DECISION POINTS,
INCLUDING:
1. THE TOTAL VALUE OF THE PORTFOLIO, INCLUDING
ANNUAL DEVELOPMENT COSTS, FUNDING SOURCES, AND PREDICTED ONGOING
OPERATING COSTS OVER THE NEXT 5 YEARS;
2. A SUMMARY OF NEW PROJECTS, THE ADVANTAGES OF
THE PROJECTS, AND ANY NEW OR INNOVATIVE ASPECTS OF THE DEVELOPMENT
PROCESSES;
3. AN ASSESSMENT OF THE NEW TECHNOLOGIES AND
BEST PRACTICES EMPLOYED ACROSS THE PORTFOLIO, INCLUDING HOW THOSE
TECHNOLOGIES ALIGN TO THE STATE MASTER PLAN;
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
4. A DASHBOARD GRAPHIC TO DEPICT THE BASIC
STATUS OF ALL PROJECTS IN THE PORTFOLIO, INCLUDING THE STATUS AS IT
RELATES TO MILESTONES AND FINANCIAL INVESTMENT;
5. AN ASSESSMENT OF ANY RISKS IDENTIFIED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION, BY TYPE AND AGENCY; AND
6. FOR THE ENTIRE PORTFOLIO, AN ASSESSMENT OF
PROJECT MANAGEMENT AND OVERSIGHT, DELINEATED BY AGENCY–LED PROJECTS
AND DEPARTMENT–LED PROJECTS, INCLUDING ALL ANTICIPATED CHANGES IN
SCOPE OR COSTS AND PROJECT TRACKING METRICS; AND
(III) MADE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 3.5–316 of
Article – State Finance and Procurement of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, on or before June 30, 2026, the Secretary of Budget and Management,
with the approval of the Governor, to meet the requirements of this Act, may transfer by
budget amendment to the Maryland Office of Digital Experience, as enacted by Section 1
of this Act, the following appropriations included in the fiscal year 2026 operating budget,
as enacted by Chapter _ (H.B. 350) of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025:
(1) up to $4,300,000 in staff augmentation funds; and
(2) up to 20% of the remaining appropriation to the Information
Technology Investment Fund under § 3.5–309 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law:
(1) on or before June 30, 2026, the Governor may transfer to the Maryland
Office of Digital Experience, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, up to 50 positions, vacant
or filled, along with the associated funds and unexpended appropriations that were
included in the fiscal year 2026 operating budget, as enacted by Chapter (H.B. 350) of
the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025; and
(2) an individual who is a permanent or contractual staff member in a
budgeted position in the Department of Information Technology or a unit of the State
executive branch whose position is transferred to the Maryland Office of Digital Experience
shall be transferred without any decrease to or loss of the individual’s rights, pay, status,
working conditions, benefits, or retirement benefit status.
– 25 –

Ch. 846 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in fiscal year 2026, the
Department of Information Technology:
(1) shall work with units of State government to find economies of scale
through use of one statewide productivity suite under one State license but may provide for
specific exceptions as necessary to meet specific unit needs;
(2) shall identify any other technology licensing or costs that could be
reduced with a statewide contract for licensing or services; and
(3) provide that any savings identified through the provisions of this
section shall accrue to the Information Technology Investment Fund to assist in
implementing the provisions of this Act.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That in fiscal year 2026, except for
funds transferred under Sections 3 and 4 of this Act, no additional general funds beyond
those appropriated for the Department of Information Technology in the fiscal year 2026
operating budget, as enacted by Chapter (H.B. 350) of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2025, may be used to implement this Act.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee shall
convene a workgroup to evaluate the provisions of this Act, including:
(1) the duties and responsibilities that should be assigned to the
Department of Information Technology, the Maryland Office of Digital Experience, the
Major Information Technology Development Project Oversight Division, the Maryland
Digital Service Unit, or other offices in the Department;
(2) what, if any, additional actions should be taken to ensure adequate
resolution of the findings made by the Office of Legislative Audits in 2024;
(3) whether it would be efficient and effective to have a Department of
Information Technology employee embedded on–site in units of State government with a
major information technology development project to assist in project management, to
provide expertise, and to serve as a liaison between the unit and the Department;
(4) whether additional or independent procurement authority should be
given to the Department of Information Technology; and
(5) whether there are more efficient and effective ways or mechanisms,
including establishment of an independent information technology project management
authority to provide project and program management and implementation.
SECTION 2. 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2025.
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 846
Enacted under Article II, § 17(c) of the Maryland Constitution, May 25, 2025.
– 27 –